Utah statutes.
54-3-8.5.   Rate on electricity for agricultural irrigation or drainage.

The commission in approving any rate applicable to customers who use electric power for agricultural irrigation or soil drainage purposes which includes a demand or power charge as a separate charge shall take into consideration the productive utilization of agricultural water and electric energy.

